Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2650
Recording of conservator's letters.

Letters of conservatorship are evidence of transfer of all assets of a protected person to the conservator. An order terminating a conservatorship is evidence of transfer of all assets of the estate from the conservator to the protected person, or his successors. Subject to the requirements of general statutes governing the filing or recordation of documents of title to land or other property, letters of conservatorship, and orders terminating conservatorships, may be filed or recorded to give record notice of title as between the conservator and the protected person.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 268, UPC § 5-421.